Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 5. Compliance with Statutory Requirements Regarding Cigarette Sales.

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative findings and purpose relating to ch. 103, SLA 2003, which added AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

, see § 1, ch. 103, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 103, SLA 2003 (House Bill 224), see 2003 House Journal 674 — 675.

Sec. 43.50.460.
Tobacco product manufacturer certifications.

Every tobacco product manufacturer whose cigarettes are sold in this state, whether directly or through a distributor, retailer, or similar intermediary or intermediaries, shall execute and deliver on a form or in the manner prescribed by the commissioner a certification to the commissioner, no later than April 30 of each year, certifying, under penalty of perjury, that, as of the date of the certification, the tobacco product manufacturer is either a participating manufacturer or is in full compliance with AS 45.53.

A participating manufacturer shall include in its certification a list of its brand families. The participating manufacturer shall update the list 30 days before any addition or modification to its brand families by executing and delivering a supplemental certification to the commissioner.

A nonparticipating manufacturer shall include in its certification a complete list of all of its brand families. The nonparticipating manufacturer shall update the list 30 days before any addition or modification to its brand families by executing and delivering a supplemental certification to the commissioner. A nonparticipating manufacturer’s certification must

separately list brand families of cigarettes and the number of units sold for each brand family that was sold in the state during the preceding calendar year;

list all of its brand families that have been sold in the state at any time during the current calendar year;

indicate by an asterisk any brand family sold in the state during the preceding calendar year that is no longer being sold in the state as of the date of the certification; and

identify by name and address any other manufacturer of the listed brand families in the preceding calendar year.

For a nonparticipating manufacturer, the certification required by (a) of this section must additionally certify that the nonparticipating manufacturer

is registered to do business in the state or has appointed a resident agent for service of process and provided notice of the appointment as required by AS

43.50.475

;

has

established and continues to maintain a qualified escrow fund; and

executed a qualified escrow agreement that has been reviewed and approved by the Department of Law and that governs the qualified escrow fund; and

is in full compliance with AS 45.53 and this section, and any regulations adopted under those statutes.

For a nonparticipating manufacturer, the certification must also include the

name, address, telephone number, and electronic mail address of the financial institution where the nonparticipating manufacturer has established the qualified escrow fund required under AS 45.53 and the regulations adopted under that chapter;

account number of the qualified escrow fund and sub-account number for the State of Alaska;

amount that the non-participating manufacturer placed in the qualified escrow fund for cigarettes sold in the state during the preceding calendar year, the date and amount of each such deposit, and the evidence or verification considered necessary by the commissioner to confirm the information submitted under this section; and

amounts of and dates of any withdrawal or transfer of money the nonparticipating manufacturer made at any time from the qualified escrow fund or from any other qualified escrow fund into which the nonparticipating manufacturer ever made escrow payments in accordance with AS 45.53 and the regulations adopted under that chapter.

A tobacco product manufacturer may not include a brand family in its certification unless

for a participating manufacturer, the participating manufacturer affirms that the brand family is to be considered to be its cigarettes for purposes of calculating its payments under the Master Settlement Agreement for the relevant year, in the volume and shares determined under the Master Settlement Agreement; and

for a nonparticipating manufacturer, the nonparticipating manufacturer affirms that the brand family is to be considered to be its cigarettes for purposes of AS 45.53.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or otherwise affecting the state’s right to maintain that a brand family constitutes cigarettes of a different tobacco product manufacturer for purposes of calculating payments under the Master Settlement Agreement or for purposes of AS 45.53.

A tobacco product manufacturer shall maintain all invoices and documentation of sales of cigarettes and other information relied upon for the certification for a period of five years, unless otherwise required by law to maintain them for a greater period of time.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 2003; am § 50 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.50.500

and renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 43.50.465.
Directory of cigarettes approved for sale and importation.

Not later than July 30 of each year, the commissioner shall develop and make available for public inspection a directory listing all tobacco product manufacturers that have provided current and accurate certifications conforming to the requirements of AS

43.50.460

and all brand families that are listed in those certifications, except as follows:

the commissioner may not include or retain in the directory the name or brand families of any nonparticipating manufacturer that fails to provide the required certification or whose certification the commissioner determines is not in compliance with AS

43.50.460

, unless the commissioner has determined that the violation has been cured to the satisfaction of the commissioner;

neither a tobacco product manufacturer nor brand family shall be included or retained in the directory if the commissioner concludes that

for a nonparticipating manufacturer, all escrow payments required under AS 45.53 for any period for any brand family, regardless of whether listed by the nonparticipating manufacturer, have not been fully paid into a qualified escrow fund governed by a qualified escrow agreement that has been approved by the Department of Law; or

all outstanding final judgments, including interest on those judgments, for violations of AS 45.53 have not been fully satisfied for the brand family and the manufacturer;

the commissioner shall update the directory as necessary in order to correct mistakes and to add or remove a tobacco product manufacturer or brand families to keep the directory in conformity with the requirements of AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

;

every licensee shall provide to the commissioner, and update as necessary, an electronic mail address for the purpose of receiving any notifications that may be required by AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.50.510

and renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

” was substituted for “AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.590

” and “AS

43.50.460

” was substituted for “AS

43.50.500

” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 43.50.470.
Prohibition against sale or importation of cigarettes not in the directory.

A person may not sell, offer, or possess for sale in this state, or import for personal consumption in this state, cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family not included in the directory.

Under regulations adopted by the department, the department may allow a licensee a credit for the tax paid under this chapter on cigarettes that the licensee destroys or returns to the manufacturer or distributor to avoid a violation of this section if

the tobacco product manufacturer and brand family of the cigarettes were included in the directory at the time the licensee came into possession of the cigarettes; and

the tobacco product manufacturer or brand family was subsequently removed from the directory while the licensee was still in possession of the cigarettes.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.50.520

and renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 43.50.475.
Agent for service of process.

A nonresident or foreign nonparticipating manufacturer that has not registered to do business in the state as a foreign corporation or business entity shall, as a condition precedent to having its brand families listed or retained in the directory, appoint and continually engage without interruption the services of an agent in this state to act as agent for the service of process on whom all process and an action or proceeding against the nonparticipating manufacturer concerning or arising out of the enforcement of AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

and AS 45.53 may be served in any manner authorized by law. The nonparticipating manufacturer shall provide the name, address, telephone number, electronic mail address, and proof of the appointment and availability of the agent to and to the satisfaction of the commissioner and the Department of Law.

The nonparticipating manufacturer shall provide notice to the commissioner and the Department of Law 30 calendar days before termination of the authority of an agent and shall additionally provide proof to the satisfaction of the Department of Law of the appointment of a new agent no less than five calendar days before the termination of an existing agent appointment. If an agent terminates an agency appointment, the nonparticipating manufacturer shall notify the commissioner and the Department of Law of the termination within five calendar days and shall include proof to the satisfaction of the Department of Law of the appointment of a new agent.

Any nonparticipating manufacturer whose products are sold in this state without appointing or designating an agent as required by this section is considered to have appointed the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development as its agent and may be proceeded against in courts of this state by service of process upon the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development in the manner described by AS

10.06.175(b)

, regardless of whether the nonparticipating manufacturer is a corporation; however, the appointment of the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development as the agent does not satisfy the condition precedent to having the nonparticipating manufacturer’s brand families listed or retained in the directory.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.50.530

and renumbered in 2003 at which time “AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

” was substituted for “AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.590

”
to reflect the 2003 renumbering of those sections.

In 2004, in (c) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.50.480.
Reporting and disclosure of information; escrow installments.

Not later than the end of the month following the month in which cigarettes were imported or sold in the state, each licensee shall submit the information the commissioner requires to facilitate compliance with AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

, including a list by brand family of the total number of cigarettes or, in the case of roll-your-own cigarettes, the equivalent stick count for which the licensee, during the previous calendar month, paid the tax due for the cigarettes. For a period of five years, the licensee shall maintain and make available to the commissioner all invoices and documentation of sales of cigarettes of all nonparticipating manufacturers and any other information relied upon in reporting to the commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized to disclose to the Department of Law any information received under this chapter and requested by the Department of Law for purposes of determining compliance with and enforcing the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner and the Department of Law shall share with each other the information received under this chapter, and may share the information with other federal, state, or local agencies only for purposes of enforcement of AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

, AS 45.53, or corresponding laws of other states.

The commissioner or Department of Law may require at any time that the nonparticipating manufacturer provide proof from the financial institution in which the manufacturer has established a qualified escrow fund for the purpose of compliance with AS 45.53 of the amount of money in the fund being held on behalf of the state and the dates of deposits, and listing the amounts of all withdrawals from the fund and the dates of withdrawals.

In addition to the information required to be submitted under (a) of this section, the commissioner or the Department of Law may require a licensee or tobacco product manufacturer to submit any additional information, including samples of the packaging or labeling of each brand family, necessary to enable the commissioner or the Department of Law to determine whether a tobacco product manufacturer is in compliance with AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

.

To promote compliance with the provisions of AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

, the commissioner may adopt regulations requiring a tobacco product manufacturer subject to the requirements of AS

43.50.460

to make the escrow deposits required in quarterly installments during the year in which the sales covered by the deposits are made. The commissioner may require production of information sufficient to determine the adequacy of the amount of the installment deposit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.50.540

and renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

”
was substituted for “AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.590

” and “AS

43.50.460

” was substituted for “AS

43.50.500

” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 43.50.485.
Penalties and other remedies.

In addition to or in place of any other civil or criminal remedy provided by law, upon a determination that a licensee has violated AS

43.50.470(a)

or any regulation adopted under that statute, the commissioner may revoke or suspend the license issued under AS

43.50.010

,

43.50.035

, or

43.50.320

of any licensee. The department shall comply with the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). Each offer to sell cigarettes in violation of AS

43.50.470(a)

constitutes a separate violation. The commissioner also may impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed the greater of 500 percent of the retail value of the cigarettes sold or $5,000 upon a determination of violation of a provision of AS 43.50.470(a) or any regulations adopted under that statute. The penalty shall be imposed in the manner provided by AS

43.05.245

.

Any cigarettes that have been sold, offered for sale, or possessed for sale in this state, or imported for personal consumption in this state in violation of AS

43.50.470(a)

are contraband, regardless of whether the violation was knowing, and the cigarettes are subject to seizure and forfeiture; seized and forfeited cigarettes shall be destroyed and may not be resold. The department shall comply with the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The Department of Law, on behalf of the commissioner, may seek an injunction to restrain a threatened or actual violation of AS

43.50.460

,

43.50.470(a)

, or

43.50.480

by a licensee and to compel the licensee to comply with those provisions.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.50.550

and renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

43.50.470(a)

” was substituted for “AS

43.50.520(a)

” and “AS

43.50.460

,

43.50.470(a)

, or

43.50.480

” was substituted for “AS

43.50.500

,

43.50.520(a)

, or

43.50.540

” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 43.50.490.
Miscellaneous provisions.

A determination of the commissioner not to list in, or to remove from, the directory a brand family or tobacco product manufacturer is subject to administrative review under AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

.

A person may not be issued a license or granted a renewal of a license under AS

43.50.010

,

43.50.035

, or

43.50.320

unless the person has certified in writing, under penalty of perjury, that the person will comply fully with AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

.

The department shall adopt under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) reasonable regulations that it considers necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

.

If a court determines that a person has violated the provisions of AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

, the court shall order any profits, gain, gross receipts, or other benefit from the violation to be disgorged and paid to the state for deposit in the general fund. Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties provided by AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.50.560

and renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

” was substituted for “AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.590

”
to reflect the 2003 renumbering of those sections.

Sec. 43.50.495.
Definitions.

In AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“brand family” means all styles of cigarettes sold under the same trade mark and differentiated from one another by means of additional modifiers or descriptors, including menthol, lights, kings, and 100s; “brand family” includes any brand name, alone or in conjunction with any other word, trademark, logo, symbol, motto, selling message, recognizable pattern of colors, or any other indicium of product identification identical or similar to, or identifiable with, a previously known brand of cigarettes;

“cigarette” has the meaning given in AS

45.53.100

;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of revenue;

“department” means the Department of Revenue;

“directory” means the directory developed and made available under AS

43.50.465

;

“licensee” means a person licensed or required to be licensed under AS

43.50.010

,

43.50.035

, or

43.50.320

;

“Master Settlement Agreement” has the meaning given in AS

45.53.100

;

“nonparticipating manufacturer” means a tobacco product manufacturer that is not a participating manufacturer;

“participating manufacturer” has the meaning given in sec. II(jj) of the Master Settlement Agreement and all amendments to that agreement;

“qualified escrow fund” has the meaning given in AS

45.53.100

;

“roll-your-own” has the meaning given in AS

45.53.100

(4)(B);

“tobacco product manufacturer” has the meaning given in AS

45.53.100

;

“units sold” has the meaning given in AS

45.53.100

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

43.50.590

and renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

43.50.460

—

43.50.495

” was substituted for “AS

43.50.500

—

43.50.590

” and “AS

43.50.465

” was substituted for “AS

43.50.510

” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of those sections.